Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.160

Statute—Exact words need not be used.

Words used in a statute to define a crime need not be strictly pursued in the indictment or information, but other words conveying the same meaning may be used.

[ 1891 c 28 s 28; Code 1881 s 1013; 1873 p 226 s 196; 1869 p 241 s 191; RRS s 2064.]